Hawaii statutes.
§415A-2 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Disqualified person" means any
natural person, corporation, partnership, fiduciary, trust, association,
government agency, or other entity which for any reason is or becomes
ineligible under this chapter to own shares issued by a professional
corporation.

"Licensing authority" means the
officer, board, agency, court, or other authority in this State which has the
power to issue a license or other legal authorization to render a professional
service.

"Other entity" includes a domestic or
foreign corporation, whether organized for profit or not, a domestic or foreign
limited liability company, general partnership, limited partnership, or limited
liability partnership.

"Professional corporation" means a
domestic professional corporation for profit subject to this chapter.

"Professional service" means any
service which lawfully may be rendered only by persons licensed under chapters
442, 448, 453, 455, 457, 459, 461, 463E, 465, 466, 471, and 605, and section
554-2.

"Qualified person" means an
individual who is eligible under this chapter to own shares issued by a
professional corporation. [L 1985, c 259, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 135, §106 and
c 300, §2; am L 1989, c 81, §1; am L 1995, c 198, §5; am L 1996, c 13, §8; am L
1997, c 48, §1; am L 1999, c 280, §8; am L 2002, c 40, §42 and c 130, §73; am L
2009, c 11, §49]

Note

The 2009 amendment is retroactive to April 3, 2008. L 2009,
c 11, §76(2).

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next